District of Columbia statutes.
47-355.05

Reporting requirements of the Chief Financial Officer and Agency Fiscal Officers.

(a)

The Chief Financial Officer shall submit reports to the Council and the Mayor on a quarterly basis indicating each agency’s actual expenditures, obligations, and commitments, each by source of funds, compared to their approved spending plan. This report shall be accompanied by the CFO’s observations regarding spending patterns and steps being taken to assure spending remains within the approved budget.

(a-1)

Each Agency Financial Officer (“AGO”) shall submit quarterly reports to the Chairperson of the Council committee that has purview over the AGO’s agency. Each report shall include the agency’s actual expenditures, obligations, and commitments, organized by source of funds, and compared to their approved spending plan. The report shall be accompanied by the AGO’s analysis of spending patterns and of the steps taken to assure that spending remains within the approved budget.

(b)

The Chief Financial Officer shall be required to develop the quarterly apportionment of funds, by source of funds, for each agency based on the spending plans submitted by agency heads and agency fiscal officers. The apportionment shall be binding on agencies unless otherwise modified by the Chief Financial Officer.

(c)

The Chief Financial Officer shall determine when each agency will transition to the quarterly apportionment of funds, so long as all agencies transition to quarterly apportionment within 3 years of [April 4, 2003].

(d)

Nothing in this section is intended to interfere with the exclusive authority and discretion of the District of Columbia Retirement Board to manage and control retirement funds pursuant to [Chapter 7 of Title 1].

(e)

(1)

The Chief Financial Officer shall submit a quarterly summary to the Council and the Mayor on all:

(A)

Reprogrammings;

(B)

Intra-District transfers; and

(C)

Other budget modifications that involve a change in the purpose of the use of the funds that are not included in the annual budget and are more than $50,000 and less than $500,000.

(2)

(A)

The summary shall set forth clearly and concisely each budget category affected by the reprogramming, intra-District transfer, or other budget modification, as described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, showing the original and new amounts, as follows:

(i)

For the operating budget, by:

(I)

Agency;

(II)

Object category; and

(III)

Object class; and

(ii)

For capital projects, by:

(I)

Program;

(II)

Agency;

(III)

Object category; and

(IV)

Project and subproject.

(B)

For capital projects, the summary shall also describe any consequences of the shift, such as personnel shifts or equipment transfers.

Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-285, § 2, 50 DCR 940
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 77(b), 51 DCR 881
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-293, § 2(d), 54 DCR 1083
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 169, 56 DCR 1117
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 7142(b), 57 DCR 6242
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 122(a), 58 DCR 1008

Short title: Section 7141 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle O of title VII of the act may be cited as the “Agency Financial Reporting Act of 2010”.

Short title: Section 121 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided that subtitle C of title I of the act may be cited as “Reprogramming Policy Reform Act of 2010”.

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the OCFO Audit Report Transparency Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-8, January 31, 2013, 60 DCR 3952, 20 DCSTAT 458).
For temporary addition of (f), see § 2 of the Office of the Chief Financial Officer Audit Report Transparency Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-530, November 2, 2012, 59 DCR 13332).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 122(a) of Fiscal Year 2011 Supplemental Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-694, January 19, 2011, 58 DCR 662).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of Financial Stability Measures Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-593, November 3, 2010, 57 DCR 10475).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 7142(b) of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).
For temporary (225 days) amendment of this section, see § 2 of the Office of the Chief Financial Officer Audit Report Transparency Temporary Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 19-228, November 16, 2012, 59 DCR 13578, 20 DCSTAT 263).
D.C. Law 18-370 added subsec. (e).
D.C. Law 18-223, in the section heading, substituted “Chief Financial Officer and Agency Fiscal Officers” for “Chief Financial Officer”; and added subsec. (a-1).
D.C. Law 17-353 validated a previously made technical correction in subsec. (b).
D.C. Law 16-293, substituted “agency fiscal officer” for “agency chief financial officer”.
D.C. Law 15-105, in subsec. (d), validated a previously made technical correction.
This section is referenced in § 1-301.01.